Foma_files/archaic.lexc
Multichar_Symbols @U.PASTPART.ON@ @U.PASTPART.OFF@ [PASTPART] [INF]

LEXICON Root

@U.PASTPART.OFF@   Verbs;
@U.PASTPART.ON@:@U.PASTPART.ON@y+ Verbs;
Prefix;

#LEXICON Prefix

0:y+   Verb;
       Verb;

LEXICON Verb

baptized:baptize VerbInfl;
occupied:occupy VerbInfl;
clept:clepe VerbInfl;


LEXICON VerbInfl

[PERFPART]:+ed  #;


set obey-flags = OFF

set print-space = OFF
